District of Columbia statutes.
2-201.11

Bond not required for contracts less than $25,000.

In all cases where the Mayor of the District of Columbia contracts for work or material involving a sum not exceeding $25,000 it shall not be necessary for said Mayor to require a bond with said contract.

June 28, 1906, 34 Stat. 546, ch. 3575
June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 168, ch. 182
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 629, Pub. L. 90-455, § 4
Aug. 14, 1973, 87 Stat. 305, Pub. L. 93-89, title V, § 501
Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 11(b), 23 DCR 9532b
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Definitions applicable: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-201.01.
1973 Ed., § 1-805.
1981 Ed., § 1-1107.